Hawaii statutes.
§286-133 Unlawful to permit unauthorized
person to drive. Except as provided in section 291E-67, no person shall
authorize or knowingly permit a motor vehicle or moped owned by that person or
under that person's control to be driven upon any highway by any person who is
not authorized under law to drive the motor vehicle or moped. [L 1937, c 234,
§30; RL 1945, §7331; RL 1955, §160-63; HRS §286-133; am L 1983, c 197, §1; am L
2010, c 166, §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next